Maryland, session 2026, SB0272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SCALP COOLING SYSTEM” MEANS A DEVICE USED TO
COOL THE HUMAN SCALP TO PREVENT OR REDUCE HAIR LOSS IN CONNECTION WITH
CHEMOTHERAPY TO TREAT CANCER THAT IS:
(1) DESIGNED AND INTENDED FOR REPEATED USE; AND
(2) PRIMARILY AND CUSTOMARILY USED TO SERVE A MEDICAL
PURPOSE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
– 1 –

Ch. 51 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR
CHEMOTHERAPY TO TREAT CANCER SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR SCALP
COOLING SYSTEMS USED FOR THE PRESERVATION OF HAIR IN CONNECTION WITH
THE CHEMOTHERAPY TREATMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –